Illinois, session 104th, SB2229.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 6z-112 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/6z-112)7    Sec. 6z-112. The Cannabis Regulation Fund.8    (a) There is created the Cannabis Regulation Fund in the 9State treasury, subject to appropriations unless otherwise 10provided in this Section. All moneys collected under the 11Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act shall be deposited into the 12Cannabis Regulation Fund, consisting of taxes, license fees, 13other fees, and any other amounts required to be deposited or 14transferred into the Fund.15    (b) Whenever the Department of Revenue determines that a 16refund should be made under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax 17Act to a claimant, the Department of Revenue shall submit a 18voucher for payment to the State Comptroller, who shall cause 19the order to be drawn for the amount specified and to the 20person named in the notification from the Department of 21Revenue. This subsection (b) shall constitute an irrevocable 22and continuing appropriation of all amounts necessary for the 23payment of refunds out of the Fund as authorized under this   SB2229- 2 -LRB104 05926 HLH 15959 b1subsection (b).2    (c) On or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 3Department of Revenue shall prepare and certify to the State 4Comptroller the transfer and allocations of stated sums of 5money from the Cannabis Regulation Fund to other named funds 6in the State treasury. The amount subject to transfer shall be 7the amount of the taxes, license fees, other fees, and any 8other amounts paid into the Fund during the second preceding 9calendar month, minus the refunds made under subsection (b) 10during the second preceding calendar month by the Department. 11The transfers shall be certified as follows:12        (1) The Department of Revenue shall first determine 13    the allocations which shall remain in the Cannabis 14    Regulation Fund, subject to appropriations, to pay for the 15    direct and indirect costs associated with the 16    implementation, administration, and enforcement of the 17    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act by the Department of 18    Revenue, the Department of State Police, the Department of 19    Financial and Professional Regulation, the Department of 20    Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, the 21    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, and the 22    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority.23        (2) After the allocations have been made as provided 24    in paragraph (1) of this subsection (c), of the remainder 25    of the amount subject to transfer for the month as 26    determined in this subsection (c), the Department shall   SB2229- 3 -LRB104 05926 HLH 15959 b1    certify the transfer into the Cannabis Expungement Fund 2    1/12 of the fiscal year amount appropriated from the 3    Cannabis Expungement Fund for payment of costs incurred by 4    State courts, the Attorney General, State's Attorneys, 5    civil legal aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public 6    Interest Attorney Assistance Act, and the Department of 7    State Police to facilitate petitions for expungement of 8    Minor Cannabis Offenses pursuant to Public Act 101-27, as 9    adjusted by any supplemental appropriation, plus 10    cumulative deficiencies in such transfers for prior 11    months.12        (3) After the allocations have been made as provided 13    in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection (c), the 14    Department of Revenue shall certify to the State 15    Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall transfer the 16    amounts that the Department of Revenue determines shall be 17    transferred into the following named funds according to 18    the following:19            (A) 2% shall be transferred to the Drug Treatment 20        Fund to be used by the Department of Human Services 21        for: (i) developing and administering a scientifically 22        and medically accurate public education campaign 23        educating youth and adults about the health and safety 24        risks of alcohol, tobacco, illegal drug use (including 25        prescription drugs), and cannabis, including use by 26        pregnant women; and (ii) data collection and analysis   SB2229- 4 -LRB104 05926 HLH 15959 b1        of the public health impacts of legalizing the 2        recreational use of cannabis. Expenditures for these 3        purposes shall be subject to appropriations.4            (B) 15% 8% shall be transferred to the Local 5        Government Distributive Fund and allocated as provided 6        in Section 2 of the State Revenue Sharing Act. Moneys 7        allocated to a county under this subparagraph shall be 8        directed to a fund that is under the control of the 9        sheriff of that county. The moneys shall be used to 10        fund crime prevention programs, training, and 11        interdiction efforts, including detection, 12        enforcement, and prevention efforts, relating to the 13        illegal cannabis market and driving under the 14        influence of cannabis.15            (C) 25% shall be transferred to the Criminal 16        Justice Information Projects Fund to be used for the 17        purposes of the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program 18        to address economic development, violence prevention 19        services, re-entry services, youth development, and 20        civil legal aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public 21        Interest Attorney Assistance Act. The Restore, 22        Reinvest, and Renew Program shall address these issues 23        through targeted investments and intervention programs 24        and promotion of an employment infrastructure and 25        capacity building related to the social determinants 26        of health in impacted community areas. Expenditures   SB2229- 5 -LRB104 05926 HLH 15959 b1        for these purposes shall be subject to appropriations.2            (D) 20% shall be transferred to the Department of 3        Human Services Community Services Fund, to be used to 4        address substance abuse and prevention and mental 5        health concerns, including treatment, education, and 6        prevention to address the negative impacts of 7        substance abuse and mental health issues, including 8        concentrated poverty, violence, and the historical 9        overuse of criminal justice responses in certain 10        communities, on the individual, family, and community, 11        including federal, State, and local governments, 12        health care institutions and providers, and 13        correctional facilities. Expenditures for these 14        purposes shall be subject to appropriations.15            (E) 10% shall be transferred to the Budget 16        Stabilization Fund.17            (F) 28% 35%, or any remaining balance, shall be 18        transferred to the General Revenue Fund.19    As soon as may be practical, but no later than 10 days 20after receipt, by the State Comptroller of the transfer 21certification provided for in this subsection (c) to be given 22to the State Comptroller by the Department of Revenue, the 23State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 24transfer the respective amounts in accordance with the 25directions contained in such certification.26    (d) On July 1, 2019 the Department of Revenue shall   SB2229- 6 -LRB104 05926 HLH 15959 b1certify to the State Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall 2transfer $5,000,000 from the Compassionate Use of Medical 3Cannabis Fund to the Cannabis Regulation Fund.4    (e) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and 5except as otherwise provided in this Section, this Fund is not 6subject to sweeps, administrative charge-backs, or any other 7fiscal or budgetary maneuver that would in any way transfer 8any amounts from this Fund into any other fund of the State.9    (f) The Cannabis Regulation Fund shall retain a balance of 10$1,000,000 for the purposes of administrative costs.11    (g) In Fiscal Year 2024 the allocations in subsection (c) 12of this Section shall be reviewed and adjusted if the General 13Assembly finds there is a greater need for funding for a 14specific purpose in the State as it relates to Public Act 15101-27.16(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.